Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA FOOD SHELF PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for food shelf programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.14. These appropriations are added to the base. new text end